New York, session 2025-2026, S3253.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 23-2713 of the 2 environmental conservation law, as amended by chapter 166 of the laws of 3 1991, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) The mining plan shall consist of a written and graphic description 5 of the proposed mining operation, including the boundaries of the land 6 controlled by the applicant, the outline of potential affected acreage 7 and the general sequence of areas to be mined through successive permit 8 terms. The graphic description shall include the location of the mine 9 and shall identify the land affected by mining after April first, nine- 10 teen hundred seventy-five, including but not limited to areas of exca- 11 vation; areas of overburden, tailings, and spoil; areas of topsoil and 12 mineral stock piles; processing plant areas; haulageways; shipping and 13 storage areas; drainage features and water impoundments. The written 14 description of the plan shall include the applicant's mining method and 15 measures to be taken to minimize adverse environmental impacts resulting 16 from the mining operation. Within counties with a population of one 17 million or more which draw their primary source of drinking water for a 18 majority of county residents from a designated sole source aquifer, no 19 mining plan shall be approved or renewed unless such plan provides for a 20 minimum buffer of undisturbed ground at least ten feet from the existing 21 water table at the mine site. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07545-01-5